Vermont, session 2025-2026, S99.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPORT; BENEFITS CLIFFS
On or before November 1, 2025, the Agency of Human Services shall
submit a report to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Human
Services and to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and
Welfare containing the following:
(1) an inventory of public assistance benefits and programs provided by
or through the Agency of Human Services, including the name, eligibility
requirements, and funding source of each benefit or program;
VT LEG #381199 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.99
2025 Page 2 of 2
(2) an analysis of the after-tax earnings and public resources available to
Vermonters of a specific household configuration at different levels of gross
earnings for the purpose of identifying earnings ranges where an increase in
gross earnings results in a decrease in net resources; and
(3) policy opportunities and recommendations to reduce or eliminate
earnings ranges where an increase in gross earnings results in a decrease in net
resources as a means of advancing the economic mobility of households
receiving public assistance benefits or participating in public assistance
programs.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381199 v.1